Washington statutes.
RCW 16.58.060

Certified feed lot license—Expiration—Late renewal.

Certified feed lot licenses expire on June 30th following the date of issuance. If a person fails, refuses, or neglects to apply for renewal of a license by June 30th, the person's license shall expire. To reinstate a license, the person shall be assessed a late fee of twenty-five dollars which shall be added to the regular license fee and shall be paid before the director may issue a license to the applicant.

[ 2003 c 326 s 50; 1991 c 109 s 10; 1971 ex.s. c 181 s 6.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2003 c 326: See RCW 16.57.902.